analizador/qichwa-new.lexc
LEXICON Root
Adv ;
Adj ;
Det ;
Noun ;
VTr ;
VInt ;
Num ;
Interj ;
Pron ;
PronPers ;
PronReflx ;
Prep ;
Conj ;
Adp ;
PropNoun ;
AdvEsp ;



LEXICON Det
tsay InvarDet;
kay InvarDet;
hay InvarDet;
taqay InvarDet;
wak InvarDet;
kada InvarDet;
huk	InvarDet;


LEXICON PronPers
nuqa Prs;
nuqakuna Prs;
qam Prs;
qamkuna Prs;
pay Prs;
paykuna Prs;
nuqantsik Prs;

LEXICON PronReflx
kiki Reflex;

! huk + évidentiel = pronom


LEXICON Adv
sellaama


LEXICON Num
ishka NumRoot;
kima NumRoot;
chusku NumRoot;
pistqa NumRoot;
huqta NumRoot;

ishkaq NumHum;
kimaq NumHum;
chuskuq NumHum;
pitsqaq NumHum;
huqtaq NumHum;
chunkaq NumHum;

huk NumCard;
ishkay NumCard;
kimsa NumCard;
kinsa NumCard;
chusku NumCard;
pitsqa NumCard;
huqta NumCard;
suqta NumCard;
qanchis NumCard;
pusaq NumCard;
puwaq NumCard;
isqun NumCard;
chunka NumCard;
pachak NumCard;
waranqa NumCard;

!! PRESTAMOS !!
uno NumInvar;
dos NumInvar;
tres NumInvar;
kwatru NumInvar;
sinku NumInvar;
seis NumInvar;
syete NumInvar;
dyes NumInvar;
onsi NumInvar;
dose NumInvar;
dosi NumInvar;
trese NumInvar;
beynti NumInvar;

! ------------- Invariable roots ------------- !
LEXICON AdvEsp
ademas AdvInvar;
apenas	AdvInvar;
demasyadu AdvInvar;
felismente AdvInvar;
kasi AdvInvar;
komo AdvInvar; ! podría ser SCONJ
lomismu AdvInvar;
nunka AdvInvar;
talbes AdvInvar;
todabia AdvInvar;
unikamente AdvInvar;

LEXICON Adp
desde AdpEsp;
hasta AdpEsp;

LEXICON Conj
si Sconj;
i Cconj;
o Cconj;
pero Cconj;
peru Cconj;
ni Cconj;
sino Cconj;


! ------------------- ROOT TAGS ------------------- !

LEXICON InvarDet
[DET]:0 #;

LEXICON Prs
[PRON.Prs]:0 LlaaSlot;

LEXICON Reflex
[PRON.Refl]:0 Pers;

LEXICON AdvInvar
[ADV]:0 #;

LEXICON AdpEsp
[ADP]:0 #;

LEXICON Sconj
[SCONJ]:0 #;

LEXICON Sconj
[CCONJ]:0 #;

! ------------------------------------------------- !

LEXICON LlaaSlot
+llaA[Lim]:^llaa Case;
Case;
